Arkansas, session 2025, HB1747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Babies at School Act".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A parent or guardian who is a school employee has a
responsibility to both his or her job and his or her family; and
(2) The first six (6) months of a child's life poses heightened
demands of a parent.
(b) This act is intended to increase school employee retention by
allowing schools to permit a parent or legal guardian who is a school
employee to bring his or her infant to work.


*TNL277*
03/11/2025 4:47:08 PM TNL277

HB1747
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 17, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-17-125. Infants at school — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Infant" means a:
(A) Biological child, adopted child, or stepchild under
six (6) months of age of a school employee; or
(B) Foster child under six (6) months of age who has been
placed in the home of a school employee; and
(2) "School" means:
(A) A public school district;
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school; or
(C) A private school.
(b) A school may allow a school employee to bring his or her infant to
work during a school day.
(c) A school that permits a school employee to bring his or her infant
to work during a school day under this section may:
(1) Establish a school policy that includes without limitation:
(A) The identification of an appropriate work environment;
(B) The acceptable work performance standard of the school
employee while his or her infant is at his or her workplace during a school
day; and
(C) Safety guidelines for an infant who is brought to the
workplace during a school day under this section; and
(2) Allow the school employee to bring his or her infant to work
during a school day upon the return of the school employee to the school
following maternity leave offered by the school or otherwise taken by the
school employee, as applicable.
(d) The provisions of this section do not prohibit a school from
allowing a school employee to bring to the school employee's workplace during
a school day his or her:
(1) Biological child, adopted child, or stepchild who is six (6)
months of age or older; or
(2) Foster child six (6) months of age or older who has been
placed in the home of the school employee.

03/11/2025 4:47:08 PM TNL277